Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB235.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS 344.010 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Commission" means the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights;
(2) "Commissioner" means a member of the commission;
(3) "Credit transaction" means any open-end or closed-end credit transaction,
whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction, credit card issue or
charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or business purposes, in which a
service, finance, or interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment
in scheduled payments, when the credit is extended in the regular course of
business of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations, or other financial lending institutions of
whatever nature, stockbrokers, or a merchant or mercantile establishment which
as part of its ordinary business permits or provides that payment for purchases of
property or services therefrom may be deferred;
(4) "Disability" means, with respect to an individual:
(a) A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one (1) or more of
the major life activities of the individual;
(b) A record of such an impairment; or
(c) Being regarded as having such an impairment.
Persons with current or past controlled substances abuse or alcohol abuse
problems and persons excluded from coverage by the Americans with Disabilities
Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended, shall not be considered
individuals with a disability;
(5) "Discrimination" means any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion,
Page 1 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
distinction, restriction, segregation, limitation, refusal, denial, or any other act or
practice of differentiation or preference in the treatment of a person or persons,
or the aiding, abetting, inciting, coercing, or compelling thereof made unlawful
under this chapter;
(6) "Discriminatory housing practice" means an act that is unlawful under Section
19, 20, 21, 22, or 24 of this Act;
(7) (a) "Familial status" means one (1) or more individuals who have not attained
the age of eighteen (18) years and are domiciled with:
1. A parent or another person having legal custody of the individual or
individuals; or
2. The designee of a parent or other person having custody, with the
written permission of the parent or other person.
(b) The protection afforded against discrimination on the basis of familial
status shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of
eighteen (18) years;
(8) "Family" includes a single individual;
(9) "Financial institution" means a bank, banking organization, mortgage company,
insurance company, or other lender to whom application is made for financial
assistance for the purchase, lease, acquisition, construction, rehabilitation,
repair, maintenance, or improvement of real property, or an individual employed
by or acting on behalf of any of these;
(10) "Gender identity" means having or being perceived as having a gender identity
or expression, whether or not traditionally associated with the sex assigned to that
person at birth;
(11) "Housing accommodations" includes improved and unimproved property and
means any building, structure, lot, or portion thereof which is used or occupied,
Page 2 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
or is intended, arranged, or designed to be used or occupied, as the home or
residence of one (1) or more families, and any vacant land which is offered for
sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such building or
structure;
(12) "Licensing agency" means any public or private organization which has as one
(1) of its duties the issuing of licenses or the setting of standards which an
individual must hold or must meet as a condition to practicing a particular trade
or profession or to obtaining certain employment within this Commonwealth or
as a condition to competing effectively with an individual who does hold a license
or meet the standards;
(13) "Local commission" means a local human rights commission created pursuant
to Section 18 of this Act;
(14) "Person" includes one (1) or more individuals, labor organizations, joint
apprenticeship committees, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal
representatives, mutual companies, joint stock companies, limited liability
companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy,
fiduciaries, receivers, or other legal or commercial entity, or the Commonwealth
or any of its political or civil subdivisions or agencies;
(15) "Real estate broker" or "real estate salesperson" means any individual, whether
licensed or not, who:
(a) On behalf of others, for a fee, commission, salary, or other valuable
consideration, or who with the intention or expectation of receiving or
collecting the same, lists, sells, purchases, exchanges, rents, or leases real
estate, or the improvements thereon, including options;
(b) Negotiates or attempts to negotiate on behalf of others an activity described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Advertises or holds oneself out as engaged in activities described in
Page 3 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(d) Negotiates or attempts to negotiate on behalf of others a loan secured by a
mortgage or other encumbrance upon a transfer of real estate;
(e) Is engaged in the business of charging an advance fee or contracting for
collection of a fee in connection with a contract whereby the individual
undertakes to promote the sale, purchase, exchange, rental, or lease of real
estate through its listing in a publication issued primarily for this purpose;
or
(f) Is employed by or acting on behalf of any person described in paragraphs
(a) to (e) of this subsection;
(16) "Real estate operator" means:
(a) Any individual or combination of individuals, labor organizations, joint
apprenticeship committees, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal
representatives, mutual companies, joint stock companies, limited liability
companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees in bankruptcy,
receivers, or other legal or commercial entities, the county, or any of its
agencies, that:
1. Is engaged in the business of selling, purchasing, exchanging, renting,
or leasing real estate, or the improvements thereon, including options;
or
2. Derives income, in whole or in part, from the sale, purchase,
exchange, rental, or lease of real estate; or
(b) An individual employed by or acting on behalf of any individual or entity
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(17) "Real estate-related transaction" means:
(a) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance:
1. For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a
Page 4 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
housing accommodation; or
2. Secured by real estate; or
(b) The selling, brokering, or appraising of real property, except that a person
engaged in the business of furnishing appraisals of real property shall not
take into consideration familial status, race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or
disability;
(18) "Real property" includes buildings, structures, real estate, lands, tenements,
leaseholds, cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest in them;
(19) "Sexual orientation" means an individual's actual or imputed heterosexuality,
homosexuality, or bisexuality; and
(20) "To rent" means to lease, sublease, let, or otherwise grant for a consideration the
right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant.
Section 2. KRS 344.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The general purposes of this chapter are to:
(a) [To ]Provide for execution within the Commonwealth[state] of the policies
embodied in the[ Federal] Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, as
amended[ (78 Stat. 241), Title VIII of the Federal Civil Rights Act of 1968
(82 Stat. 81)], the Fair Housing Act, Pub. L. No. 90-284, as amended[ (42
U.S.C. 360)], the[ Federal] Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967,
Pub. L. No. 90-202, as amended[ (81 Stat. 602)], the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, Pub. L. No.[ (P.L.] 101-336[)], as amended, and the
Civil Rights Act of 1991, Pub. L. No. 102-166, as amended[ ( P.L. 102-166,
amended by P.L. 102-392)];
(b) [To ]Safeguard all individuals within the Commonwealth[state] from
discrimination because of familial status, race, color, religion, national origin,
Page 5 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or[ because
of the person's status as a qualified individual with a] disability[ as defined in
KRS 344.010 and KRS 344.030]; thereby to protect their interest in personal
dignity and freedom from humiliation, to make available to the
Commonwealth[state] their full productive capacities, to secure the
Commonwealth[state] against domestic strife and unrest which would menace
its democratic institutions, to preserve the public safety, health, and general
welfare, and to further the interest, rights, and privileges of individuals within
the Commonwealth[state]; and
(c) [To ]Establish as the policy of the Commonwealth the safeguarding of the
rights of an individual selling or leasing the individual's[his] primary
residence through private sale without the aid of any real estate operator,
broker, or salesperson[salesman] and without advertising or public display.
(2) This chapter shall be construed to further the general purposes stated in this section
and the special purposes of the particular provision involved.
(3) [Nothing in ]This chapter shall not be construed as indicating an intent to exclude
local laws on the same subject matter not inconsistent with this chapter.
(4) [Nothing contained in ]This chapter shall not be deemed to repeal any other law of
this Commonwealth[state] relating to discrimination because of familial status,
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age
forty (40) and over, or[ because of the person's status as a qualified individual with
a] disability[ as defined in KRS 344.030].
Section 3. KRS 344.025 is amended to read as follows:
[No provision in ]KRS Chapter 18A shall not be construed to preclude any classified or
unclassified state employee from appealing to the personnel board any action alleged to
be in violation of laws prohibiting discrimination based on an individual's familial
status, race, color, religion, national origin,[a person's status as a qualified individual
Page 6 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
with a disability,] sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age[,] forty (40) and over, or
disability,[religion, or race or national origin], in accordance with this chapter.
Section 4. KRS 344.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is an unlawful practice for an employer to:
(a) Because of the individual's familial status, race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over,
disability, or because the individual is a smoker or nonsmoker, as long as
the individual complies with any workplace policy concerning smoking:
1. Fail or refuse to hire, or to discharge any individual, or otherwise to
discriminate against an individual with respect to compensation,
terms, conditions, or privileges of employment; or
2. Limit, segregate, or classify employees in any way that would deprive
or tend to deprive an individual of employment opportunities or
otherwise adversely affect status as an employee[To fail or refuse to
hire, or to discharge any individual, or otherwise to discriminate against
an individual with respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or
privileges of employment, because of the individual's race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, age forty (40) and over, because the person
is a qualified individual with a disability, or because the individual is a
smoker or nonsmoker, as long as the person complies with any
workplace policy concerning smoking;
(b) To limit, segregate, or classify employees in any way which would deprive or
tend to deprive an individual of employment opportunities or otherwise
adversely affect status as an employee, because of the individual's race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, or age forty (40) and over, because the person is
a qualified individual with a disability, or because the individual is a smoker
or nonsmoker, as long as the person complies with any workplace policy
Page 7 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
concerning smoking];
(b)[(c)] [To ]Fail to make reasonable accommodations for any employee with
limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth, or a related medical condition
who requests an accommodation, including but not limited to the need to
express breast milk, unless the employer can demonstrate the accommodation
would impose an undue hardship on the employer's program, enterprise, or
business. The following shall be required as to reasonable accommodations:
1. An employee shall not be required to take leave from work if another
reasonable accommodation can be provided;
2. The employer and employee shall engage in a timely, good faith, and
interactive process to determine effective reasonable accommodations;
and
3. If the employer has a policy to provide, would be required to provide, is
currently providing, or has provided a similar accommodation to other
classes of employees, then a rebuttable presumption is created that the
accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the employer; or
(c)[(d)] [To ]Require as a condition of employment that any employee or
applicant for employment abstain from smoking or using tobacco products
outside the course of employment, as long as the individual[person] complies
with any workplace policy concerning smoking.
(2) (a) A difference in employee contribution rates for smokers and nonsmokers in
relation to an employer-sponsored health plan shall not be deemed to be an
unlawful practice in violation of this section.
(b) The offering of incentives or benefits offered by an employer to employees
who participate in a smoking cessation program shall not be deemed to be an
unlawful practice in violation of this section.
(3) (a) An employer shall provide written notice of the right to be free from
Page 8 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical
conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations, to:
1. New employees at the commencement of employment; and
2. Existing employees not later than thirty (30) days after June 27, 2019.
(b) An employer shall conspicuously post a written notice of the right to be free
from discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical
conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations, at the
employer's place of business in an area accessible to employees.
Section 5. KRS 344.030 is amended to read as follows:
As used in[For the purposes of] KRS 344.030 to 344.110:
(1) ["Qualified individual with a disability" means an individual with a disability as
defined in KRS 344.010 who, with or without reasonable accommodation, can
perform the essential functions of the employment position that the individual holds
or desires unless an employer demonstrates that he is unable to reasonably
accommodate an employee's or prospective employee's disability without undue
hardship on the conduct of the employers' business. Consideration shall be given to
the employer's judgment as to what functions of a job are essential, and if an
employer has prepared a written description before advertising or interviewing
applicants for the job, this description shall be considered evidence of the essential
functions of the job;
(2) ]"Employer" means a person who has eight (8) or more employees within the
Commonwealth[state] in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current
or preceding calendar year and an agent of such a person, except for purposes of
determining accommodations for an employee's own limitations related to her
pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions, employer means a person who
has fifteen (15) or more employees within the Commonwealth[state] in each of
twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year and
Page 9 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
any agent of the person, and, except for purposes of determining discrimination
based on disability, employer means a person engaged in an industry affecting
commerce who has fifteen (15) or more employees for each working day in each of
twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, and
any agent of that person[, except that, for two (2) years following July 14, 1992, an
employer means a person engaged in an industry affecting commerce who has
twenty-five (25) or more employees for each working day in each of twenty (20) or
more calendar weeks in the current or preceding year, and any agent of that person].
For the purposes of determining discrimination based on disability, employer shall
not include:
(a) The United States, a corporation wholly owned by the government of the
United States, or an Indian tribe; or
(b) A bona fide private membership club (other than a labor organization) that is
exempt from taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Service
Code of 1986;
(2)[(3)] "Employment agency" means a person regularly undertaking with or without
compensation to procure employees for an employer or to procure for employees
opportunities to work for an employer and includes an agent of such person;
(3)[(4)] "Labor organization" means a labor organization and an agent of such an
organization, and includes an organization of any kind, an agency or employee
representation committee, group, association, or plan so engaged in which
employees participate and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of
dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay,
hours, or other terms or conditions of employment, and a conference, general
committee, joint or system board, or joint council so engaged which is subordinate
to a national or international labor organization;
(4)[(5)] (a) "Employee" means an individual employed by an employer, but does
Page 10 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
not include an individual employed by his or her parents, spouse, or child, or
an individual employed to render services as a domestic in the home of the
employer.
(b) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee nor a
franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisor for
any purpose under this chapter.
(c) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor nor a
franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisee for
any purpose under this chapter.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same
meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1;
(5)[(6)] "Reasonable accommodation":
(a) Means making existing facilities used by employees readily accessible to and
usable by individuals with disabilities, job restructuring, part-time or modified
work schedules, reassignment to a vacant position, acquisition or modification
of equipment or devices, appropriate adjustment or modifications of
examinations, training materials or policies, the provision of qualified readers
or interpreters, and other similar accommodations for individuals with
disabilities; and
(b) For an employee's own limitations related to her pregnancy, childbirth, or
related medical conditions, may include more frequent or longer breaks, time
off to recover from childbirth, acquisition or modification of equipment,
appropriate seating, temporary transfer to a less strenuous or less hazardous
position, job restructuring, light duty, modified work schedule, and private
space that is not a bathroom for expressing breast milk;
Page 11 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
(6)[(7)] "Religion" means all aspects of religious observance and practice, as well as
belief, unless an employer demonstrates that it [he ]is unable to reasonably
accommodate to an employee's or prospective employee's religious observance or
practice without undue hardship on the conduct of the employer's business;
(7)[(8)] (a) The terms "because of sex" and "on the basis of sex" include but are not
limited to because of or on the basis of pregnancy, childbirth, or related
medical conditions, and women affected by pregnancy, childbirth, or related
medical conditions shall be treated the same for all employment-related
purposes, including receipt of benefits under fringe benefit programs, as other
persons not so affected but similar in their ability or inability to work.
(b) "Related medical condition" includes but is not limited to lactation or the need
to express breast milk for a nursing child and has the same meaning as in the
Pregnancy Discrimination Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 2000e(k), and shall be
construed as that term has been construed under that Act; and
(8)[(9)] "Undue hardship," for purposes of disability discrimination or limitations due
to pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions as described in KRS
344.040(1)(b)[(c)], means an action requiring significant difficulty or expense,
when considered in light of the following factors:
(a) The nature and cost of the accommodation needed;
(b) The overall financial resources of the facility or facilities involved in the
provision of the reasonable accommodation; the number of persons employed
at the facility; the effect on expenses and resources; or the impact otherwise of
such accommodation upon the operation of the facility;
(c) The overall financial resources of the covered entity; the overall size of the
business of a covered entity with respect to the number of its employees; and
the number, type, and location of its facilities;
(d) The type of operation or operations of the covered entity, including the
Page 12 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
composition, structure, and functions of the workforce of such entity; the
geographic separateness, administrative, or fiscal relationship of the facility or
facilities in question to the covered entity; and
(e) In addition to paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection, for pregnancy,
childbirth, and related medical conditions, the following factors:
1. The duration of the requested accommodation; and
2. Whether similar accommodations are required by policy to be made,
have been made, or are being made for other employees due to any
reason.
Section 6. KRS 344.050 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]It is an unlawful practice for:
(1) An employment agency to fail or refuse to refer for employment[,] or to otherwise[
to] discriminate against[,] an individual because of [his]familial status, race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age forty (40)
and over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability, or to
classify or refer for employment an individual because of[on the basis of
disability,] familial status, race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity,[ or] age[ between] forty (40) and over, or disability;
or[seventy (70).]
(2) [It is an unlawful practice for ]A licensing agency to refuse to license, or to bar or
terminate from licensing an individual because of familial status, race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age forty (40)
and over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability.
Section 7. KRS 344.060 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for a labor organization to:
(1) [To ]Exclude or[ to] expel from its membership[,] or to otherwise[ to] discriminate
against[,] a member, or applicant for membership, because of familial status, race,
Page 13 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age
forty (40) and over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a]
disability;[.]
(2) [To ]Limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or to classify or fail to refuse to
refer for employment an individual, in any way which would deprive or tend to
deprive an individual of employment opportunities, or would limit such
employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect the status as an employee
or as an applicant for employment, because of familial status, race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age forty (40) and
over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability; or[.]
(3) [To ]Cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an individual in
violation of this section.
Section 8. KRS 344.070 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for an employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management
committee controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining, including on-the-job
training programs, to discriminate against an individual because of familial status, race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age forty
(40) and over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability in
admission to or employment in, any program established to provide apprenticeship or
other training.
Section 9. KRS 344.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is an unlawful practice for an employer, labor organization, licensing agency, or
employment agency to print or publish or cause to be printed or published a notice
or advertisement relating to employment by such an employer or membership in or
any classification or referral for employment by the employment or licensing
agency, indicating any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination, based
on familial status, race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
Page 14 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
gender identity,[ or] age forty (40) and over, or[ because the person is a qualified
individual with a] disability.[, except that such a notice or advertisement may]
(2) It shall not be a violation of subsection (1) of this section for a notice or
advertisement to indicate a preference, limitation, or specification based on
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[or] age forty (40)
and over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability, when
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[or] age forty (40)
and over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability, is a
bona fide occupational qualification for employment.
Section 10. KRS 344.100 is amended to read as follows:
[Notwithstanding ]Any[ other] provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding,
it is not an unlawful practice for an employer to:
(1) Apply different standards of compensation, or different terms, conditions, or
privileges of employment pursuant to a bona fide seniority or merit system, or a
system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of production or to
employees who work in different locations, if the differences are not the result of an
intention to discriminate because of familial status, race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age forty (40) and over, or[
because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability; or[, nor is it an
unlawful practice for an employer to ]
(2) Give and to act upon the results of any professionally developed ability test
provided that the test, its administration, or action upon the results is not designed,
intended, or used to discriminate because of familial status, race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age forty (40) and
over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability.
Section 11. KRS 344.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not be construed to require[Nothing contained in this chapter
Page 15 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
requires] an employer, employment agency, labor organization, or joint labor-
management committee subject to this chapter to grant preferential treatment to an
individual or to a group because of the familial status, race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age forty (40) and over, or[
because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability, of the individual or
group on account of an imbalance which may exist with respect to the total number
or percentage of individuals[persons] of any familial status, race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age forty (40) and
over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual with a] disability, employed by
an employer, referred or classified for employment by an employment agency or
labor organization, admitted to membership or classified by a labor organization, or
admitted to, or employed in, an apprenticeship or other training program, in
comparison with the total number or percentage of individuals[persons] of familial
status, race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity,[ or] age forty (40) and over, or[ because the person is a qualified individual
with a] disability, in the Commonwealth[state] or a community, section, or other
area, or in the available workforce in the Commonwealth[state] or a community,
section, or other area.
(2) [Nothing contained in ]This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit:
(a) Minimum hiring ages otherwise provided by law;[.]
(b) State compliance with federal regulations;[.]
(c) Termination of the employment of any person who is unable to perform the
essential functions of the job, with or without reasonable accommodation;[.]
(d) Any post-job-offer physical or medical examinations of applicants or
employees which an employer requires to determine their ability to perform
the essential functions of the job, with or without reasonable accommodation;
or[.]
Page 16 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
(e) An employer, labor organization, or employment agency from observing the
terms of a bona fide seniority system or any bona fide employee benefit plan
such as a retirement, pension, or insurance plan which is not a subterfuge to
evade the purposes of this chapter, except that no such employee benefit plan
shall excuse the failure to hire any individual.
Section 12. KRS 344.120 is amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in KRS 344.140 and 344.145, it is an unlawful practice for
a person to deny an individual the full and equal enjoyment of the goods, services,
facilities, privileges, advantages, and accommodations of a place of public
accommodation, resort, or amusement because[, as defined in KRS 344.130, on the
ground] of the individual's familial status[ disability], race, color, religion,[ or] national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or disability.
Section 13. KRS 344.140 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for a person, directly or indirectly, to publish, circulate, issue,
display, or mail, or cause to be published, circulated, issued, displayed, or mailed, a
written, printed, oral, or visual communication, notice, or advertisement, which indicates
that the:
(1) Goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, and accommodations of a place
of public accommodation, resort, or amusement will be refused, withheld from, or
denied an individual because[on account] of familial status[disability], race, color,
religion,[ or] national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40)
and over, or disability; or[ that the ]
(2) Patronage of, or presence at, a place of public accommodation, resort, or
amusement, of an individual, because[on account] of familial status[disability],
race, color, religion,[ or] national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
age forty (40) or over, or disability is objectionable, unwelcome, unacceptable, or
undesirable.
Page 17 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
Section 14. KRS 344.170 is amended to read as follows:
The function of the commission shall be to encourage fair treatment for, to foster mutual
understanding and respect among, and to discourage discrimination against individuals
on the basis of familial status, race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or disability[any racial or ethnic
group or its members].
Section 15. KRS 344.180 is amended to read as follows:
The powers and duties of the commission shall be to:
(1) [To ]Employ an executive director and other necessary personnel within the limits
of funds made available;
(2) [To ]Conduct research projects or make studies into and publish reports on
discrimination in Kentucky;
(3) [To ]Receive and investigate complaints of discrimination and to recommend ways
of eliminating any injustices occasioned thereby;
(4) [To ]Hold public hearings and request the attendance of witnesses;
(5) [To ]Cooperate with other organizations, public and private, to discourage
discrimination;
(6) [To ]Encourage fair treatment for all persons regardless of familial status, race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty
(40) and over, or disability[national ancestry]; and
(7) [To ]Make an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly of its
activities under this chapter.
Section 16. KRS 344.190 is amended to read as follows:
In the enforcement of this chapter, the commission[ on Human Rights] shall have the
following powers and duties:
(1) To maintain an office in the city of Louisville and other offices within the
Commonwealth[state] as may be deemed necessary;[.]
Page 18 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
(2) To meet and exercise its powers at any place within the Commonwealth;[.]
(3) Within the limitations provided by law, to appoint an executive director, attorneys,
hearing examiners, clerks, and other employees and agents as it may deem
necessary. At the direction of the commission, attorneys appointed under this
section may appear for and represent the commission in any court. The commission
may, by written order, delegate the authority given by this subsection to its
executive director, except as that authority relates to the appointment of its
executive director;[.]
(4) To promote the creation of local commissions on human rights, to cooperate with
state, local, and other agencies, both public and private, and individuals, and to
obtain upon request and utilize the services of all governmental departments and
agencies;[.]
(5) To cooperate with the[ United States] Equal Employment Opportunity Commission,
created by[ Section 705 of] the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352[ (78
Stat. 241)], in order to achieve the purposes of that act, and with other federal and
local agencies in order to achieve the purposes of that act, and with other federal
and local agencies in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter;[.]
(6) To accept gifts or bequests, grants, or other payments, public or private, to help
finance its activities;[.]
(7) To accept reimbursement pursuant to Section 709(b) of the Civil Rights Act of
1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352,[ (78 Stat. 241)] for services rendered to assist the[
Federal] Equal Employment Opportunity Commission;[.]
(8) To receive, initiate, investigate, seek to conciliate, hold hearings on, and pass upon
complaints alleging violations of this chapter;[.]
(9) At any time after a complaint is filed, to require answers to interrogatories, compel
the attendance of witnesses, examine witnesses under oath or affirmation in person
or by deposition, and require the production of documents relevant to the complaint.
Page 19 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
The commission may make rules authorizing any member or individual designated
to exercise these powers in the performance of official duties;[.]
(10) To furnish technical assistance requested by persons subject to this chapter to
further their compliance with this chapter or an order issued thereunder;[.]
(11) To make studies appropriate to effectuate the purposes and policies of this chapter
and to make the results[ thereof] available to the public;[.]
(12) To render annual written reports to the Governor and the General
Assembly[Legislature]. The reports may contain recommendations of the
commission for legislative or other action to effectuate the purposes and policies of
this chapter;[.]
(13) To create local or statewide advisory agencies that in its judgment will aid in
effectuating the purpose of this chapter. The commission may empower these
agencies to:
(a) [To ]Study and report on problems of discrimination because of familial
status, race, color, religion,[ or] national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or disability;[,]
(b) [To ]Foster, through community effort or otherwise, goodwill among the
groups and elements of the population of the Commonwealth;[state,] and
(c) [To ]Make recommendations to the commission for the development of
policies and practices that will aid in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.
Members of these agencies[such committees] shall serve without pay but
shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in such service. The commission
may make provision for technical and clerical assistance to the
agencies;[committees.]
(14) To[ adopt,] promulgate administrative[, amend, and rescind] regulations pursuant
to KRS Chapter 13A to effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter,
including regulations requiring the posting of notices prepared or approved by the
Page 20 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
commission; and[.]
(15) To purchase liability insurance for the protection of all members of the commission
to protect them from liability arising in the course of pursuing their duties as
members of the commission and for all full-time employees to protect them from
liability arising in the course or scope of their employment. This insurance shall be
purchased with money contained in the agency appropriated budget.
Section 17. KRS 344.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) City, county, urban-county, consolidated local, unified local, and charter county
governments[Cities and counties] are authorized to adopt and enforce ordinances,
orders, and resolutions prohibiting all forms of discrimination, including
discrimination on the basis of familial status, race, color, religion,[ disability,
familial status, or] national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age
forty (40) and over, or disability and to prescribe penalties for violations thereof,
such penalties being in addition to the remedial orders and enforcement herein
authorized.
(2) (a) City, county, urban-county, consolidated local, unified local, and charter
county governments[Cities and counties] may adopt and enforce ordinances,
orders, and resolutions prohibiting discrimination.[;]
(b) No ordinance, order, or resolution shall attempt to exempt more transactions
from its coverage than are exempted by KRS 344.362 and 344.365.
Section 18. KRS 344.310 is amended to read as follows:
Any city,[ or] county, urban-county, consolidated local, unified local, or charter county
government, or one (1) or more of those local governments[cities and counties] acting
jointly, may create a local[ human rights] commission to[ (hereinafter a "local
commission")]:
(1) [To ]Provide for execution within its jurisdiction of the policies embodied in this
chapter and the[ Federal] Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, as
Page 21 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
amended[ (78 Stat. 241)]; and
(2) [To ]Safeguard all individuals within its jurisdiction from discrimination because of
familial status, race, color, religion,[ or] national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity,[ or] age forty (40) and over, or disability.
Section 19. KRS 344.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is an unlawful housing practice for a real estate operator, or for a real estate
broker, real estate salesman, or any person employed by or acting on behalf of any
of these to:
(a) Because of the individual's familial status, race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or
disability:
1. Refuse to sell, exchange, rent, or lease, or otherwise deny to or
withhold, real property from any individual;
2. Discriminate against any individual in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of the sale, exchange, rental, or lease of real property or in
the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;
3. Refuse to receive or transmit a bona fide offer to purchase, rent, or
lease real property from any individual;
4. Refuse to negotiate for the sale, rental, or lease of real property to any
individual;
5. Represent to any individual that real property is not available for
inspection, sale, rental, or lease when it is so available, or to refuse to
permit any individual to inspect real property;
6. Offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property for sale,
rental, or lease with the understanding that any individual may be
discriminated against in the sale, rental, or lease of that real property
or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith; or
Page 22 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
7. Otherwise deny to or withhold real property from any individual;
(b) Make, print, circulate, post, or mail or cause to be printed, circulated,
posted or mailed an advertisement or sign, or to use a form of application
for the purchase, rental, or lease of real property, or to make a record of
inquiry in connection with the prospective purchase, rental, or lease of real
property, which indicates, directly or indirectly, a limitation, specification,
or discrimination as to familial status, race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or
disability, or an intent to make such a limitation, specification, or
discrimination;[
(1) To refuse to sell, exchange, rent, or lease, or otherwise deny to or withhold, real
property from any person because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status,
disability, or national origin;
(2) To discriminate against any person because of race, color, religion, sex, familial
status, disability, or national origin in the terms, conditions, or privileges of the sale,
exchange, rental, or lease of real property or in the furnishing of facilities or
services in connection therewith;
(3) To refuse to receive or transmit a bona fide offer to purchase, rent, or lease real
property from any person because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status,
disability, or national origin;
(4) To refuse to negotiate for the sale, rental, or lease of real property to any person
because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status, disability, or national origin;
(5) To represent to any person that real property is not available for inspection, sale,
rental, or lease when it is so available, or to refuse to permit any person to inspect
real property because of his race, color, religion, sex, familial status, disability, or
national origin;
(6) To make, print, circulate, post, or mail or cause to be printed, circulated, posted, or
Page 23 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
mailed an advertisement or sign, or to use a form of application for the purchase,
rental, or lease of real property, or to make a record of inquiry in connection with
the prospective purchase, rental, or lease of real property, which indicates, directly
or indirectly, a limitation, specification, or discrimination as to race, color, religion,
sex, familial status, disability, or national origin or an intent to make such a
limitation, specification, or discrimination;
(7) To offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property for sale, rental, or
lease with the understanding that any person may be discriminated against in the
sale, rental, or lease of that real property or in the furnishing of facilities or services
in connection therewith because of his race, color, religion, sex, familial status,
disability, or national origin;
(8) To otherwise deny to or withhold real property from any person because of his race,
color, religion, sex, familial status, disability, or national origin;]
(c)[(9)] [To ]Discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable
or deny, a housing accommodation to any buyer or renter because of a
disability of:
1.[(a)] That buyer or renter;
2.[(b)] A person residing in or intending to reside in that housing
accommodation after it is so sold, rented, or made available; or
3.[(c)] Any person associated with that buyer or renter; or
(d)[(10)] [To ]Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or
facilities in connection with such housing accommodation, because of a
disability of:
1.[(a)] That person;[ or]
2.[(b)] A person residing in or intending to reside in that housing
accommodation after it is sold, rented, or made available; or
Page 24 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
3.[(c)] Any person associated with that person.
(2)[(11)] For purposes of this section, discrimination includes:
(a) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the disabled person, reasonable
modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by a person, if
the modifications may be necessary to afford the person full enjoyment of the
premises; except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is
reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter
agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the condition that existed
before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;[.]
(b) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices, or
services, when the accommodations may be necessary to afford the person
equal opportunity to use and enjoy a housing accommodation; or
(c) In connection with the design and construction of covered multifamily
housing accommodations for first occupancy after January 1, 1993, a failure
to design and construct those housing accommodations in a manner ensuring
that they have at least one (1) entrance on an accessible route unless
impractical to do so because of the terrain or unusual characteristics of the
site. Housing accommodations with a building entrance on an accessible route
shall comply with the following requirements:
1. The public use and common use portions of the housing
accommodations shall be readily accessible to and usable by disabled
persons;
2. All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premises
within the housing accommodations shall be sufficiently wide to allow
passage by disabled persons in wheelchairs; and
3. All premises within the housing accommodations shall contain the
following features of adaptive design:
Page 25 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
a. An accessible route into and through the housing accommodation;
b. Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other
environmental controls in accessible locations;
c. Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of
grab bars; and
d. Usable kitchens and bathrooms so that an individual in a
wheelchair can maneuver about the space.
(3)[(12)] Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the American National
Standard for buildings and facilities providing accessibility and usability for
physically disabled persons, [(]commonly cited as ["]ANSI A117.1 - 1986,[")]
suffices to satisfy the requirements of subsection (2)[(11)](c)3. of this section.
(4)[(13)] As used in subsection (2)[(11)] of this section,[ the term] "covered
multifamily housing accommodation" means:
(a) Buildings consisting of four (4) or more units if the buildings have one (1) or
more elevators; and
(b) Ground floor units in other buildings consisting of two (2) or more units.
(5)[(14)] This section shall not be construed to require that[Nothing in this section
requires that] a housing accommodation be made available to an individual whose
tenancy would constitute a direct threat to the health or safety of other individuals
or whose tenancy would result in substantial physical damage to the property of
others.
Section 20. KRS 344.367 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for a person in the business of insuring against hazards to refuse
to enter into, or discriminate in the terms, conditions, or privileges of, a contract of
insurance against hazards to a housing accommodation because of the familial status,
race, color, religion, national origin,[ familial status, disability, or] sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or disability of persons owning[,]
Page 26 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
or residing in or near the housing accommodation.
Section 21. KRS 344.370 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for a financial institution or for any person or other entity whose
business includes engaging in real estate-related transactions to:
(1) [To ]Discriminate against an individual because of the familial status, race, color,
religion,[ or] national origin,[ familial status, disability,] sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity,[ or] age forty (40) and over, or disability of the individual or the
present or prospective owner, tenant, or occupant of the real property or of a
member, stockholder, director, officer, employee, or representative of any of these,
in the granting, withholding, extending, modifying, or renewing the rates, terms,
conditions, privileges, or other provisions of financial assistance or in the extension
of services in connection therewith;
(2) [To ]Use a form of application for financial assistance or to make or keep a record
or inquiry in connection with applications for financial assistance which indicate,
directly or indirectly, a limitation, specification, or discrimination as to familial
status, race, color, religion, national origin[ familial status, disability], sex, sexual
orientation,[ or] gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or disability,[national
origin] or an intent to make such a limitation, specification, or discrimination; or
(3) [To ]Discriminate by refusing to give full recognition, because of sex, to the income
of each spouse or the total income and expenses of both spouses where both
spouses become or are prepared to become joint or several obligors in real estate
transactions[; or
(4) As used in this section, the term "real estate-related transaction" means any of the
following:
(a) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance;
1. For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a
housing accommodation; or
Page 27 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
2. Secured by real estate.
(b) The selling, brokering, or appraising of real property except that a person
engaged in the business of furnishing appraisals of real property may take into
consideration factors other than race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
disability, or familial status].
Section 22. KRS 344.380 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for a real estate operator, a real estate broker, a real estate
salesperson[salesman], a financial institution, an employee of any of these, or any other
person, for the purpose of inducing a real estate transaction from which a person may
benefit financially to:
(1) [To ]Represent that a change has occurred or will or may occur in the composition
with respect to familial status, race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or disability[, familial status,
or national origin] of the owners or occupants in the block, neighborhood, or area in
which the real property is located;
(2) [To ]Represent that this change will or may result in the lowering of property
values, an increase in criminal or antisocial behavior, or a decline in the quality of
schools in the block, neighborhood, or area in which the real property is located; or
(3) [To ]Induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any dwelling by
representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a
person or persons of a particular familial status, race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or
disability[, familial status, or national origin].
Section 23. KRS 344.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be an unlawful practice for any person, whether acting on behalf of
oneself[for himself] or another, in connection with any credit transaction because of
familial status, race, color, religion, national origin,[ or] sex, sexual orientation,
Page 28 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
gender identity, or disability to:
(a) Deny credit to any person;
(b) Increase the charges or fees for or collateral required to secure any credit
extended to any person;
(c) Restrict the amount or use of credit extended or impose different terms or
conditions with respect to the credit extended to any person or any item or
service related thereto; or
(d) Attempt to do any of the unlawful practices defined in this section.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not prohibit any party to a credit transaction
from considering the:
(a) Credit history of any individual applicant; or
(b) Application of Kentucky law on dower and curtesy or descent and
distribution to the particular case or from taking reasonable action thereon.
[(3) The provisions of this section shall not prohibit any party to a credit transaction
from considering the application of Kentucky law on dower, curtesy, descent and
distribution to the particular case or from taking reasonable action thereon. ]
Section 24. KRS 344.680 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to, or membership or participation in, any
multiple listing service, real estate brokers' organization, or other service, organization, or
facility relating to the business of selling or renting housing accommodations, or to
discriminate against a person in the terms or conditions of access, membership, or
participation, because[on account] of familial status, race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability[, familial status, or national
origin].
Section 25. KRS 210.033 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "developmental disabilities" has the same meaning as in
KRS 387.510.
Page 29 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
(2) The General Assembly finds that in addition to the rights provided under KRS
Chapter 347 for developmentally disabled persons, the rights of individuals with
intellectual or developmental disabilities include but are not limited to the right to:
(a) Be treated at all times with courtesy and respect and with full recognition of
their dignity and individuality;
(b) Accessible, appropriate, safe, equal, and sanitary living, learning, and working
environments that comply with local, state, and federal standards and
recognize the individual's need for privacy and independence;
(c) Practice the religion of their choice or to abstain from the practice of religion;
(d) Ownership and use of personal possessions to maintain individuality and
personal dignity;
(e) Pursue vocational opportunities that will promote and enhance economic
independence;
(f) Be treated equally as citizens under the law;
(g) Be free from emotional, psychological, verbal, and physical abuse;
(h) Participate in decisions that affect their lives and promote self-determination
in relation to their cognitive abilities;
(i) Participate in their personal financial affairs to the extent not otherwise
determined by order of a court of competent jurisdiction or otherwise by law;
(j) Confidential treatment of all information in their personal and medical
records, except to the extent that disclosure or release of records is permitted
under KRS 210.235;
(k) Voice grievances and recommend changes in policies and services without
coercion or discrimination;
(l) Freely participate in the political process to the extent provided by law;
(m) Communicate verbal or nonverbal refusal to participate in medical or
psychological experiments;
Page 30 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
(n) Participate in integrated programs of education, training, social development,
habilitation, and recreation;
(o) Fair and equal wages in integrated work places; and
(p) Choose and maintain healthcare providers, personal care providers, services,
and supports to the extent not otherwise required by order of a court of
competent jurisdiction or otherwise by law.
(3) The general purposes of this section are to:
(a) Safeguard all individuals within the state from discrimination because of the
person's status as an individual with an intellectual or developmental
disability;
(b) Protect the individual's interest in personal dignity and freedom from
humiliation;
(c) Make available to the state the individual's full productive capacities; and
(d) Further the interest, rights, and privileges of individuals with intellectual
disabilities and developmental disabilities within the state.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to repeal any other law of this state relating
to discrimination because of the person's[ status as a qualified individual with a]
disability as defined in Section 1 of this Act[ KRS 344.030].
Section 26. KRS 18A.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A classified employee with status shall not be dismissed, demoted, suspended
without pay, or involuntarily transferred except for cause.
(2) Prior to dismissal, a classified employee with status shall be notified in writing of
the intent to dismiss the individual[him or her]. The notice shall also state:
(a) The specific reasons for dismissal, including:
1. The statutory, regulatory, or policy violation;
2. The specific action or activity on which the intent to dismiss is based;
3. The date and place of such action or activity; and
Page 31 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
4. The names of the parties involved;
(b) That the employee has the right to appear personally, or with counsel if the
employee[he or she] has retained counsel, to reply to the appointing authority
or the cabinet's or agency's[his or her] designee; and
(c) Whether the employee is placed on administrative leave by the appointing
authority with pay upon receiving the intent to dismiss letter prior to the
agency's final action.
(3) The Personnel Cabinet shall prescribe and distribute a pretermination form to be
completed and forwarded by an employee who wishes to appear before the
appointing authority or the cabinet's or agency's[his or her] designee. The form
shall be attached to every notice of intent to dismiss and shall contain written
instructions explaining:
(a) The right granted an employee under the provisions of this section relating to
pretermination hearings; and
(b) The time limits and procedures to be followed by all parties in pretermination
hearings.
(4) No later than five (5) working days after receipt of the notice of intent to dismiss,
excluding the day the employee[he or she] receives the notice, the employee may
request to appear, personally or with counsel if the employee[he or she] has retained
counsel, to reply to the appointing authority or the cabinet's or agency's[his or her]
designee.
(5) Unless agreed to by the appointing authority or the cabinet's or agency's[his or her]
designee and the employee, the appearance shall be scheduled within six (6)
working days after receipt of an employee's request to appear before the appointing
authority or the cabinet's or agency's[his or her] designee, excluding the day the
employee's[his or her] request is received.
(6) No later than five (5) working days after the employee appears before the
Page 32 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
appointing authority or the cabinet's or agency's[his or her] designee, excluding the
day of the appearance, the cabinet head or agency or the cabinet's or agency's[his
or her] designee shall:
(a) Determine whether to dismiss the employee or to modify or rescind the intent
to dismiss; and
(b) Notify the employee in writing of the decision.
(7) If the appointing authority or the cabinet's or agency's[his or her] designee
determines that the employee shall be dismissed, the employee shall be notified in
writing of:
(a) The effective date of the employee's[his or her] dismissal;
(b) The specific reason for the dismissal, including:
1. The statutory, regulatory, or policy violation;
2. The specific action or activity on which the dismissal is based;
3. The date and place of the action or activity; and
4. The names of the parties involved; and
(c) That the employee[he or she] may appeal the dismissal to the board within
thirty (30) calendar days after receipt of this notification, excluding the day
the employee[he or she] receives notice.
(8) A classified employee with status who is demoted, suspended without pay, or
involuntarily transferred shall be notified in writing of:
(a) The demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer;
(b) The effective date of the demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer;
(c) The specific reason for the demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer,
including:
1. The statutory, regulatory, or policy violation;
2. The specific action or activity on which the demotion, suspension, or
involuntary transfer is based;
Page 33 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
3. The date and place of the action or activity; and
4. The names of the parties involved; and
(d) That the employee[he or she] has the right to appeal to the board within thirty
(30) calendar days, excluding the day that the employee[he or she] received
notification of the personnel action.
(9) Any unclassified employee who is dismissed, demoted, suspended without pay, or
involuntarily transferred for cause may, within thirty (30) calendar days after the
dismissal, demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer, appeal to the board for
review thereof.
(10) (a) An employee whose position is reallocated shall be notified in writing by the
appointing authority of:
1. The reallocation or reclassification; and
2. If the reallocation or reclassification is to a lower grade, the
employee's[his or her] right to request reconsideration by the secretary
within ten (10) working days of receipt of the notice, excluding the day
the employee[he or she] receives notification.
(b) The employee shall file a written request for reconsideration of the
reallocation or reclassification to a lower grade with the secretary in a manner
and form prescribed by the secretary and shall be given a reasonable
opportunity to be heard by the secretary. The secretary shall make a
determination within sixty (60) calendar days after the request has been filed
by an employee. The secretary's determination shall be final and shall not be
appealable to the Personnel Board.
(11) (a) Any applicant, classified employee, or federally funded time-limited
employee may appeal to the board an action alleged to be based on
discrimination due to familial status, race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity[disability], age forty (40) and
Page 34 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
over[above], disability, or any other category protected under state or federal
civil rights laws. [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed to preclude
any applicant, classified employee, or unclassified employee from filing with
the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights a complaint alleging
discrimination on the basis of familial status, race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age forty (40) and over, or
disability[, or age in accordance with KRS Chapter 344].
(b) Appeals alleging discrimination shall be filed within thirty (30) calendar days
after the alleged discriminatory action occurred.
(12) (a) Any applicant for classified employment under KRS Chapter 18A who has
been notified by the Personnel Cabinet that the applicant[he or she] did not
meet the minimum qualifications for a position may request reconsideration
from the secretary not more than ten (10) calendar days after the notification
was sent. The secretary's review and determination of the reconsideration
shall be completed within ten (10) calendar days from the receipt of the
request for reconsideration. The secretary's determination shall be final and
shall not be appealable to the Personnel Board.
(b) Any applicant for employment in a classified position under KRS Chapter
18A may appeal the hiring agency's nonselection based on an alleged
violation of appointment and promotion provisions contained in this chapter
or administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter to the board. The
appeal shall be filed not later than thirty (30) calendar days after the notice of
nonselection was mailed or sent electronically.
(13) When an employee who qualifies for a position has the employee's[his or her] name
removed from the register, the employee may petition the secretary for the
opportunity to be heard by the secretary or the cabinet's or agency's[his or her]
designee. The petition shall be delivered to the secretary in writing or electronically
Page 35 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
no later than ten (10) calendar days after the removal notification has been sent. The
secretary's decision shall be final and not appealable to the Personnel Board.
(14) (a) Appeals to the board shall be in writing on an appeal form prescribed by the
board. The Personnel Board shall be responsible for the distribution of these
forms.
(b) The appeal form shall be attached to any notice of dismissal, demotion,
suspension, or involuntary transfer. The appeal form shall instruct the
employee to state whether the employee[he or she] is a classified or
unclassified employee, the employee's[his or her] full name, the
employee's[his or her] appointing authority, work station address and
telephone number, home address and personal telephone number, personal
email address, and, if the employee[he or she] has retained counsel at the time
an appeal is filed[he or she files an appeal], the name, address, and telephone
number of the employee's[his or her] attorney.
(c) The form shall also instruct a classified employee to state the action the
employee[he or she] is appealing in a short, plain, concise statement of the
facts. The form shall instruct an unclassified employee to make a short, plain,
concise statement of the reason for the appeal and the cause given for the[his
or her] dismissal, demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer.
(d) Any appeal form filed by a classified or unclassified employee shall identify
the statute, administrative regulation, or policy that was allegedly violated.
(e) Upon receipt of the appeal by the board, the appointing authority and the
Personnel Cabinet shall be notified and the board shall schedule a hearing.
(15) All administrative hearings conducted by the board shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(16) (a) The board shall deny a hearing to an employee who has failed to file an
appeal within the time prescribed by this section; and to an unclassified
Page 36 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
employee who has failed to state the reasons for the appeal and the cause for
the dismissal, demotion, suspension without pay, or involuntary transfer[
which he or she has been dismissed, demoted, suspended without pay, or
involuntarily transferred]. The board shall deny any appeal after a preliminary
hearing if it lacks jurisdiction to grant relief. The board shall notify the
employee of its denial in writing and shall inform the employee of the[his or
her] right to appeal the denial under the provisions of KRS 18A.100.
(b) Any investigation by the board of any matter related to an appeal filed by an
employee shall be conducted only upon notice to the employee, the
employee's counsel, and the appointing authority. All parties to the appeal
shall have access to information produced by the investigations and the
information shall be presented at the hearing.
(17) Each appeal shall be decided individually, unless otherwise agreed by the parties
and the board. The board shall not:
(a) Employ class action procedures; or
(b) Conduct test representative cases.
(18) Board members shall abstain from public comment about a pending or impending
proceeding before the board. This shall not prohibit board members from making
public statements in the course of their official duties or from explaining for public
information the procedures of the board.
(19) An appeal to the board may be heard by the full board or one (1) or more of the
following:
(a) Its executive director;[,]
(b) Its general counsel;[,]
(c) Any nonelected member of the board;[,] or
(d) Any hearing officer secured by the board pursuant to KRS 13B.030.
(20) (a) If the board finds that the action complained of was taken by the appointing
Page 37 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
authority in violation of laws prohibiting favor for, or discrimination against,
or bias with respect to, the employee's[his or her] political or religious
opinions or affiliations or ethnic origin, or in violation of laws prohibiting
discrimination because of such individual's familial status, race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,[ or] age
forty (40) and over, or disability, the appointing authority shall immediately
reinstate the employee to the employee's[his or her] former position or a
position of like status and pay, without loss of pay for the period of time at
issue, or otherwise make the employee whole unless the order is stayed by the
board or the court on appeal.
(b) If the board finds that the action complained of was taken without just cause,
the board shall order the immediate reinstatement of the employee to the[his
or her] former position or a position of like status and pay, without loss of pay
for the period of time at issue, or otherwise make the employee whole unless
the order is stayed by the board or the court on appeal.
(c) If the board finds that the action taken by the appointing authority was
excessive or erroneous in view of all the surrounding circumstances, the board
shall direct the appointing authority to modify or rescind the action at issue.
(d) In all other cases, the board shall direct the appointing authority to rescind the
action taken or otherwise grant specific relief or dismiss the appeal.
(21) If a final order of the board is appealed, a court may award reasonable attorney fees
to an employee who prevails by a final adjudication on the merits as provided by
KRS 453.260. This award shall not include attorney fees attributable to the hearing
before the board.
(22) When any employee is dismissed and not ordered reinstated after the appeal, the
board in its discretion may direct that the employee's[his or her] name be placed on
an appropriate reemployment list for employment in any similar position other than
Page 38 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
the one from which the employee[he or she] had been removed.
(23) After a final decision has been rendered by the board or court, an employee who
prevails in an[his or her] appeal may be credited with the amount of leave time
used for time spent at the[his or her] hearing before the board or court. Employees
who had an insufficient amount of leave time shall be credited with leave time
equal to the amount of time spent at their hearings before the board or court.
(24) If the appointing authority appeals the final order of the board, unless the board
rules otherwise, the reinstated employee shall remain in the[his or her] former
position, or a position of like status or pay, until the conclusion of the appeals
process, at which time the appointing authority shall take action in accordance with
the court order.
(25) After a final decision in a contested case has been rendered by the last
administrative or judicial body to which the case has been appealed, the board shall
make the decision available to the public in electronic format on its website and
shall organize the decisions according to the statutory basis for which the appeal
was based.
(26) Appeals concerning dismissals of classified employees with status shall take
precedence for hearings before the board over all other appeals.
(27) Any classified or unclassified employee as defined in KRS 18A.005 who is not
restored to a position pursuant to KRS 61.371 to 61.377, or who is dismissed
without cause within one (1) year after reinstatement, may appeal to the Personnel
Board. The appeal shall be filed in writing with the executive director of the board
not later than thirty (30) days after the notification of the action in question has
been mailed or sent electronically.
(28) If an individual received a notice that does not comply with subsection (7)(c),
(8)(d), or (14)(b) of this section, or received no written or electronic notification of
the[his or her] dismissal, demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer pursuant to
Page 39 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1397
subsection (7) or (8) of this section, the employee[he or she] shall file an[his or her]
appeal to the board within one hundred eighty (180) days of:
(a) Receipt of the written notice, if the employee[he or she] received a written
notice that does not comply with subsection (7)(c), (8)(d), or (14)(b) of this
section; or
(b) The alleged act, if the employee[he or she] did not receive written or
electronic notification of the alleged act in question.
(29) If a classified or unclassified employee refuses or fails to cooperate as a witness in
an agency, Personnel Cabinet, or board investigation, hearing, proceeding, or
inquiry, the employee may be subject to disciplinary action.
(30) Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, the board shall not have jurisdiction over
any appeal except as authorized by this section.
Page 40 of 40
XXXX 1/30/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed